en: Play slide design: Dual; Spiral; Straight; Tube; Wavy; Other
ko: 미끄럼틀 디자인: 듀얼; 스프링; 일자형; 튜브; 웨이브; 기타
nl: Ontwerp speelgoed glijbaan: Dubbel; Spiraal; Steil; Tube; Golf; Andere
da: Legerutsjebanedesign: Dobbelt; Spiral; Lige; Tube; Bølget; Andet
pt-PT: Design de reprodutor de slides: Duplo; Em espiral; Liso; Tubo; Ondulado; Outro
pt-BR: Design do escorregador: Dual; Espiral; Liso; Tubo; Ondulado; Outro
de: Rutschendesign: Zwei; Spirale; Glatt; Rohr; Wellig; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Design tobogan de joacă: Dublu; Spiralat; Drept; Tub; Ondulat; Altele
sv: Rutschkana - design: Dubbel; Spiral; Rakt; Tub; Vågigt; Övrigt
sk-SK: Dizajn šmykľavky: Dvojitý; Špirálový; Rovný; Tuba; Vlnitý; Iné
es: Diseño del tobogán de juego: Doble; Espiral; Liso; Tubo; Ondulado; Otros
bg-BG: Дизайн на възпроизвеждане на слайд: Двоен; Спирала; Прав; Тръба; Вълнообразен; Други
zh-CN: 滑滑梯设计: 双温区; 螺旋; 直; 管状滑道; 波浪滑道; 其他
th: การออกแบบอุปกรณ์การเล่นสไลด์: คู่; แบบเกลียว; ผมตรง; หลอด; แบบลอน; อื่นๆ
it: Design dello scivolo: Doppie; Spirale; Dritto; Tubo; Mossi; Altro
fr: Conception du toboggan: Double; Spirale; Lisses; Tube; Ondulé; Autre
ru: Конструкция детской горки: Двойной; Спиральный; Прямой; Трубчатый; Волнистый; Другой
zh-TW: 播放幻燈片設計: 雙重; 螺旋式; 直; 管狀; 波浪式; 其他
sl-SI: Zasnova igralnega tobogana: Dvojna; Spiralna; Ravna; Tuba; Valovita; Drugo
ja: スライドデザインを再生する: デュアル; スパイラル; ストレート; チューブ; ウェーブのかかった; その他
tr: Slayt tasarımını oynat: Çift; Sarmal; Düz; Tüp; Dalgalı; Diğer
nb: Design for å spille av lysbilde: Dobbel; Spiral; Rett; Slange; Bølgete; Annet
vi: Thiết kế cầu trượt: Hai nhiệt độ; Xoắn ốc; Tóc thẳng; Ống; Tóc xoăn gợn sóng; Khác
fi: Leikkiliukumäen suunnittelu: Kaksiosainen; Kierre; Suorat; Putkilo; Aaltoilevat; Muu
el: Σχεδιασμός τσουλήθρας παιχνιδιού: Διπλός; Σπιράλ; Ευθεία; Μακαρόνι; Κυματιστά; Άλλο
lt-LT: Vaikiškos čiuožyklos dizainas: Dviguba; Spiralė; Tiesi; Vamzdis; Banguota; Kita
hr-HR: Dizajn dječjeg tobogana: Dvostruki; Spirala; Ravni; Cijev; Valoviti; Ostalo
cs: Design skluzavky: Duální; Spirála; Rovné; Tuba; Vlnité; Jiné
hu: Csúszda kialakítása: Dupla; Spirál; Egyenes; Cső; Hullámos; Egyéb
pl: Konstrukcja zjeżdżalni: Dual; Spiralny; Prosta; Świetlówka; Falista; Inne